California statutes. Public Resources Code
(c) “Bushy Lake” means a body of water in the Bushy Lake area with approximately 11 acres of water surface in the summer and approximately 80 acres in the winter.

(d) “Lower American River” means that portion of the American River between Nimbus Dam and the confluence of the American River with the Sacramento River.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 665.)
-------------------------------------------

5832.

The Legislature finds and declares that:

(a) The lower American River is in the California Wild and Scenic Rivers System as designated in subdivision (e) of Section 5093.54, and has thus been determined by the Legislature as possessing extraordinary scenic, recreational, fishery, and wildlife values.

(b) The County of Sacramento on September 10, 2008, by Resolution No. 2008-0946, and the City of Sacramento on November 6, 2008, by Resolution No. 2008-731, have adopted, and the City of Rancho Cordova on September 15, 2008, by Resolution No. 110-2008, has endorsed, the 2008 American River Parkway Plan with promulgated land use regulations to prevent urban and other incompatible
 encroachment into the parkway, a 29-mile open-space greenbelt in the lower American River flood plain.

(c) The California Exposition flood plain contains an unprotected block of significant riparian habitat remaining in the lower American River flood plain, and the United States Fish and Wildlife Service has determined that this riparian habitat is of vital importance and an integral part of the American River.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 482, Sec. 1.   (AB 889)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

5833.

(a) The California Exposition and State Fair Board of Directors shall preserve, for public day use and enjoyment, the California Exposition flood plain in a manner consistent with the definition of a state park in accordance with Section 5019.53 and consistent with the American River Parkway Plan, an element of the Sacramento County General Plan. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the parking of public and private vehicles may be permitted during the State Fair and only on the flood plain land abutting the riverside toe of the levee as it exists on January 1, 1977, on approximately 11 unsurfaced acres beginning at least 400 feet east of the Bushy Lake area and extending not more than 1,500 feet along the toe of such levee eastward of the Bushy Lake area and extending not more than a distance of
 300 feet riverward from such levee.

(b) The California Exposition and State Fair also may utilize the area referenced in subdivision (a) for California Exposition exhibitor parking related to agricultural and equestrian events taking place on the California Exposition land in a livestock pavilion, an equestrian arena, or both, if the livestock pavilion and equestrian arena are sited as they were sited on April 1, 2009. The total number of days that parking may be permitted under this subdivision and subdivision (a) shall not exceed 34 days per year.

(c) In addition to the parking permitted by subdivisions (a) and (b), one acre of the existing unsurfaced 11-acre parking area shall be open to parkway users for public access to include equestrian staging, connection to trails, and a new walk-in boat access point, only if the California Exposition’s exclusive use for parking on the
 entire 11 unsurfaced acres during the State Fair as authorized in subdivision (a) and for exhibitor parking related to agricultural and equestrian events taking place at the California Exposition livestock pavilion and equestrian arena, as authorized by subdivision (b), is not impeded.

(d) The coordination and management of public parkway user access and parking and the California Exposition’s periodic exclusive use of the unsurfaced 11-acre area for a period that shall not exceed 34 days per year, as specified in subdivisions (b) and (c), shall be addressed in a management agreement between the American River Parkway Manager and the California Exposition and State Fair. The management agreement shall be consistent with this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 482, Sec. 2.   (AB 889)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

5834.

The California Exposition and State Fair Board of Directors shall preserve and manage, or provide, pursuant to an agreement with the American River Parkway Manager, for the management of, the Bushy Lake area in accordance with Section 5019.71 and the land use designations and policies of the American River Parkway Plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 482, Sec. 3.   (AB 889)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

5835.

In enacting this chapter, it is not the intent of the Legislature to require removal, or preclude use, repair, or additional construction of, highways, electric transmission lines, sewage lines, or waterlines through the California Exposition flood plain. Further, it is not the intent of the Legislature to preclude the use of emergency vehicles, maintenance vehicles, or vehicles necessary for the construction of parkway facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 665.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 10. Urban American River Parkway Preservation [5840. - 5843.]

5840.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Urban American River Parkway Preservation Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 10, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

5841.

(a) “American River Parkway Plan” means the revised, updated management plans for the lower American River adopted by the County of Sacramento on September 10, 2008, by Resolution No. 2008-0946, and by the City of Sacramento on November 6, 2008, by Resolution No. 2008-731, and endorsed by the City of Rancho Cordova on September 15, 2008, by Resolution No. 110-2008.

(b) “Lower American River” means that portion of the American River between Nimbus Dam and the confluence of the American River with the Sacramento River and the adjacent lands as described in the American River Parkway Plan.

(c) “American River Parkway” means the area described in the American River
 Parkway Plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 482, Sec. 4.   (AB 889)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

5841.5.

(a) The American River Parkway and its environs contribute to the quality of life within the City of Sacramento, the City of Rancho Cordova, and the County of Sacramento, enhance the image of the cities and the county as desirable places to live, provide for the public safety and welfare of the community, and thereby contribute to the economic well-being of the community.

(b) The lower American River serves as a floodway channel, protecting the community from runoff, rainfall, and snowmelt.

(c) The lower American River sustains a myriad of fish populations, including steelhead, king salmon, striped bass, shad, and other fish and wildlife populations, which in
 turn annually support millions of recreation user-days and commercial, scientific, and educational uses and benefits.

(d) The recreation capacity of the American River Parkway is immense, including such diverse activities as hiking, bicycling, picnicking, birding, horseback riding, canoeing, kayaking, rafting, sailing, and power cruising.

(e) It is essential that the function of the lower American River and its environs, as a regional open-space resource within the center of the City of Sacramento, the City of Rancho Cordova, and County of Sacramento, be supported and maintained.

(f) Actions undertaken by a state agency can drastically affect the American River Parkway and negate planning steps taken by appropriate local agencies.

(g) Adoption of the
 American River Parkway Plan by the State of California provides necessary recognition so that local planning efforts are eligible to receive planning grants through the Land and Water Conservation Fund, technical staff assistance through the National Park Service, and financial assistance through the Soil Conservation Service’s Cooperative River Basin Planning Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 482, Sec. 5.   (AB 889)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

5842.

(a) The Legislature hereby adopts the American River Parkway Plan so as to provide coordination with local agencies in the protection and management of the diverse and valuable natural land, water, native wildlife, and vegetation of the American River Parkway.

(b) Actions of state and local agencies with regard to land use decisions shall be consistent with the American River Parkway Plan, subject to the following provisions:

(1) This chapter does not impair the authority and responsibilities of state or local public agencies in maintaining and operating the flood channel, levees, and pump stations, except that these operations, as nearly as practicable, shall
 be consistent with the American River Parkway Plan.

(2) This chapter does not affect the existing authority of the City of Sacramento to conduct or settle litigation involving the validity or application of the American River Parkway Plan.

(3) This chapter does not prohibit the reasonable expansion of the water treatment facility operated by the City of Sacramento.

(4) This chapter does not impair the authority and responsibilities of state agencies in managing the California Exposition flood plain or Bushy Lake area pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 5830).

(5) This chapter does not affect the exercise of existing water rights.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the
 Legislature finds and declares that Chapter 10 of the American River Parkway Plan, titled Area Plans, which consists of maps, policies, and narrative, may be amended through a local amendment process. However, Area Plans may be amended only to the extent that they are not inconsistent with the state-adopted Area Plan policies contained in Chapter 2 of the American River Parkway Plan. The Legislature recognizes that amendments to Area Plans shall be carried out by the Sacramento County Board of Supervisors in accordance with the public hearing process described in Chapter 11 of the American River Parkway Plan, titled Implementation, and recognizes the roles and responsibilities of public agencies set forth in the public hearing process including coordination with the city councils of the Cities of Sacramento and Rancho Cordova.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 195.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

5843.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the duties and responsibilities provided for in this chapter be accomplished by utilizing existing staff resources and that no additional funding be provided other than that which is appropriated by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 10, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 10.5. Lower American River Conservancy Program [5845. - 5845.10.]

5845.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the Lower American River Conservancy Program Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 375, Sec. 1.   (AB 1716)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

5845.1.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The Lower American River is one of California’s most important natural environments, providing recreational, environmental, and educational opportunities to more than 8,000,000 visitors each year. It also serves as a unique urban greenbelt composed of more than 5,000 acres and lying immediately next to and within two incorporated cities and the unincorporated County of Sacramento.

(2) The American River Parkway includes natural and recreational resources of statewide interest and is often referred to as “the jewel” of the Sacramento region, and it is managed as such with an
 intent to fulfill the vision set forth through past collaborative efforts involving advocates and stakeholders, the County of Sacramento, state agencies, and the Legislature.

(3) The American River Parkway was established by the County of Sacramento, with financial support from the state and other public and private entities.

(4) Since establishing the American River Parkway in 1959, the County of Sacramento has and will continue to update, maintain, and determine consistency with the American River Parkway Plan and to serve as the Parkway Manager to own, manage, operate, and patrol the lands and resources within the American River Parkway.

(5) The American River Parkway provides additional benefits to the state and the Sacramento region including flood control, water supply, water quality, habitat for anadromous
 fisheries, including salmon and steelhead, habitat for migratory waterfowl, habitat for sensitive species, including Swainson’s hawks, peregrine falcons, northern harriers, white-tailed kites, and western pond turtles, and habitat for other wildlife, including river otters.

(6) The Legislature recognized the statewide importance of the American River Parkway in enacting the Urban American River Parkway Preservation Act (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 5840)), which culminated with the adoption of the American River Parkway Plan and the Bushy Lake Preservation Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 5830)).

(7) The statewide and national importance of the Lower American River Parkway was further recognized when it was designated as part of the California Wild and Scenic Rivers System and the National Wild and Scenic Rivers System. The American River Parkway Plan acts as the
 management plan for the lower American River under the California Wild and Scenic Rivers Act (Chapter 1.4 (commencing with Section 5093.50)), providing management guidance and direction for state departments and agencies, as well as local governments, in carrying out their responsibilities under that act.

(8) The state has an interest in working with local agencies to expand, enhance, and restore the natural, recreational, cultural, and educational resources in and adjacent to the American River Parkway.

(9) The establishment of the Lower American River Conservancy Program will provide a state partner to work cooperatively with local agencies, particularly the County of Sacramento in its role as the Parkway Manager, and nonprofit organizations to help fund projects and provide grants to restore, enhance, interpret, protect, and improve public access to the American River Parkway’s
 natural, recreational, educational, and cultural resources.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the Lower American River Conservancy Program be a continuation of the state’s historic role in providing funding to advance the protection and restoration of the natural resources of the Lower American River while continuing the County of Sacramento’s historic role in managing the lands and public uses of the American River Parkway.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 375, Sec. 1.   (AB 1716)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

5845.2.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Adjacent to” means downstream of the Nimbus Dam and next to or in the immediate vicinity of the American River Parkway.

(b) “Advisory committee” means the advisory committee established pursuant to Section 5845.4.

(c) “American River Parkway” means those portions of the area described in the American River Parkway Plan between the Nimbus Dam and the confluence of the American River with the Sacramento River.

(d) “American River Parkway Plan” has the same meaning as
 in subdivision (a) of Section 5841.

(e) “Board” means the Wildlife Conservation Board established pursuant to Section 1320 of the Fish and Game Code.

(f) “Fund” means the Lower American River Conservancy Fund established pursuant to Section 5845.9.

(g) “Nonprofit organization” means a private, nonprofit organization, with nonprofit status acknowledged by the United States Internal Revenue Service, that qualifies under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended, and that has among its principal charitable purposes the preservation, restoration, or interpretation of land for scientific, historic, educational, recreational, scenic, or open-space purposes, the protection of the natural environment or biological resources, or both, or the preservation or enhancement of wildlife, or both.

(h) “Parkway Manager” means the Sacramento County Board of Supervisors or its designee.

(i) “Program” means the Lower American River Conservancy Program established pursuant to Section 5845.3.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 375, Sec. 1.   (AB 1716)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

5845.3.

(a) The board shall implement and administer the Lower American River Conservancy Program, which is hereby created to receive and expend proceeds from bonds or other appropriations made in the annual Budget Act or other statutes for the benefit of the American River Parkway and related lands.

(b) In administering the program, the board shall prioritize expending moneys to develop and implement a natural resource management plan and to improve access to, and protection and restoration of, the American River Parkway.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 375, Sec. 1.   (AB 1716)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

5845.4.

(a) The board shall establish an advisory committee consisting of the following members:

(1) Three members of the Board of Supervisors of the County of Sacramento, selected by a majority vote of the board of supervisors, or their designees.

(2) Two representatives of the City of Sacramento, which may include the Mayor and one member of the City Council of the City of Sacramento, or two members of the city council, selected by a majority vote of the city council, or their designees.

(3) The Mayor or a member of the City Council of the City of Rancho Cordova, selected by a
 majority vote of the city council, or his or her designee.

(4) Representatives from the Natural Resources Agency, the Department of Finance, and the State Lands Commission.

(5) Three members from the public at large who have a demonstrated knowledge of and expertise in the American River Parkway and the American River Parkway Plan. One member shall be appointed by the Governor, one member shall be appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules, and one member shall be appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.

(b) A person shall not continue as a member of the advisory committee if that person ceases to hold the office that qualifies that person for membership. In that event, the person’s membership on the advisory committee shall automatically terminate.

(c) Members of the advisory committee shall serve without compensation.

(d) The advisory committee shall meet at least twice each calendar year at one or more locations in the County of Sacramento.

(e) Meetings of the advisory committee shall be open to the public and subject to the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 375, Sec. 1.   (AB 1716)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

5845.5.

In implementing the program, the board shall do all of the following:

(a) Coordinate its activities with the County of Sacramento, each city that includes a portion of the American River Parkway, appropriate local and regional flood control districts, and relevant state agencies.

(b) Prior to approving funding for any project, do both of the following:

(1) Consult with the County of Sacramento as to whether the board’s proposed actions pursuant to this chapter are consistent with the American River Parkway Plan.

(2) Draft a staff
 report that includes all findings, written comments, and reports submitted by the County of Sacramento and the Parkway Manager as to whether the board’s actions are consistent with the American River Parkway Plan.

(c) Administer any moneys appropriated to the board for the program or any revenues generated by the board pursuant to the program.

(d) Provide funding and assistance to the County of Sacramento for the development, update, adoption, and implementation of a natural resource management plan for the American River Parkway, and grants to other local agencies and nonprofit organizations whose projects are approved by the County of Sacramento for implementation of that plan.

(e) Prior to providing funding for any acquisition project within the American River Parkway, require and ensure that title to the lands to be acquired shall be held by the County of Sacramento or another local public entity willing to hold title to those lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 375, Sec. 1.   (AB 1716)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

5845.6.

Consistent with the American River Parkway Plan, the board, in administering the program, may do any of the following:

(a) Provide grants to local public agencies and nonprofit organizations to be used for one or more of the following purposes:

(1) The acquisition, restoration, enhancement, and maintenance of fish and wildlife habitat and other natural resources, including resources impacted by wildfire, within and adjacent to the American River Parkway. Any land acquisition funded pursuant to this paragraph shall be subject to subdivision (e) of Section 5845.5.

(2) The improvement and expansion
 of public access, recreational areas, and recreational facilities, including trails.

(3) The enhancement of interpretive and educational facilities related to the American River Parkway and its natural, cultural, and historic resources.

(4) The control and removal of invasive species and the propagation of native species.

(b) Improve and enhance lands within and adjacent to the American River Parkway. Projects funded on adjacent lands shall contribute to the advancement of American River Parkway values.

(c) Design, implement, and provide grants to local agencies and nonprofit organizations for stormwater capture and treatment projects to improve the quality of water that flows within and into the American River Parkway and to increase habitat for fish
 and wildlife. Stormwater projects may include lands within and adjacent to the American River Parkway and its tributaries downstream of the Nimbus Dam and within Sacramento County.

(d) Solicit grants, donations of in-kind services, and other contributions from federal, state, and private sources for the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 375, Sec. 1.   (AB 1716)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

5845.7.

In administering the program, the board shall not do any of the following:

(a) Fund or implement projects on lands without the written consent of the landowner.

(b) Manage, regulate, or control the use of any land owned or leased by another public agency or private party, except as provided pursuant to a written agreement between that public agency or private party.

(c) Levy any tax or special assessment.

(d) Provide grants or take other actions that are inconsistent with the American River Parkway Plan, the Bushy Lake Preservation
 Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 5830) of Division 5), or the Urban American River Parkway Preservation Act (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 5840) of Division 5).

(e) Own or acquire land.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 375, Sec. 1.   (AB 1716)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

5845.8.

To the extent feasible, in administering the program, the board shall give preference to projects that utilize the services of the California Conservation Corps or Community Conservation Corps, as defined in Section 14507.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 375, Sec. 1.   (AB 1716)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

5845.9.

(a) The Lower American River Conservancy Program Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury. Moneys in the fund shall be available, upon appropriation, for the purposes of this chapter. Moneys received by the board pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the fund, unless otherwise provided by the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code). The board shall administer the moneys appropriated to it for the program and may expend those moneys for capital improvements, land acquisition, support for the program’s operations, and other purposes consistent with this chapter. 

(b) (1) The
 board may accept money, grants, goods, or services contributed to it by a public agency or a private entity or person. Moneys received pursuant to this paragraph shall be deposited in the Donation Account, which is hereby established in the fund.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, moneys in the account are hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal year, to the board for the purposes of this chapter.

(3) Upon receipt of goods and services pursuant to paragraph (1), the board may use those goods and services for the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 375, Sec. 1.   (AB 1716)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

5845.10.

This chapter does not supersede or diminish the existing authority of any of the following:

(a) The County of Sacramento or any other entity responsible for the management, operation, maintenance, or protection of lands and resources within the American River Parkway.

(b) The Sacramento County Board of Supervisors acting as the Parkway Manager pursuant to its authority to interpret and implement the American River Parkway Plan.

(c) The board pursuant to other law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 375, Sec. 1.   (AB 1716)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 11. San Francisco Bay Area Bikeway System [5850. - 5851.]

5850.

The Association of Bay Area Governments shall develop and adopt a plan and implementation program, including a financing plan, for a continuous recreational corridor which will extend around the perimeter of San Francisco and San Pablo Bays. The plan shall include a specific route of a bicycling and hiking trail, the relationship of the route to existing park and recreational facilities, and links to existing and proposed public transportation facilities.

The plan shall do all of the following:

(a) Provide that designated environmentally sensitive areas, including wildlife habitats and wetlands, shall not be adversely affected by the trail.

(b) Provide for appropriate buffer zones along those portions of the bikeway system adjacent to designated environmentally sensitive areas.

(c) Provide that the land and funds used for trail construction and planning are not considered mitigation for wetlands losses.

(d) Provide alternative routes to avoid impingement on environmentally sensitive areas.

(e) Provide that no motorized vehicles, except to the extent necessary for emergency services, be allowed on the trail.

The association shall submit the plan to the Legislature not later than January 1, 1989.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 313, Sec. 1.   Effective July 30, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

5851.

The Association of Bay Area Governments shall establish a policy committee, which includes members of appropriate environmental organizations, to oversee development and implementation of the trail.

A cooperative working relationship shall be established with the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission, the Metropolitan Transportation Commission, state and federal agencies, and all other cities, counties, and districts, including school districts, which are affected by the proposed trail.

The association shall establish an advisory committee representing groups concerned with environmental and ecological protection of the bay and groups representing bicycling and other relevant recreational activities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 313, Sec. 1.   Effective July 30, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 12. The Great California Delta Trail System [5852. - 5855.]

5852.

“Delta” means the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta, as defined in Section 12220 of the Water Code minus the area contained in Alameda County.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 839, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

5853.

“Commission” means Delta Protection Commission as defined in Section 29721.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 839, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

5854.

(a) In accordance with the requirements of subdivision (c), the commission shall develop and adopt a plan and implementation program, including a finance and maintenance plan, for a continuous regional recreational corridor that extends around the delta, including, but not limited to, the delta’s shorelines in Contra Costa, Solano, San Joaquin, Sacramento, and Yolo Counties. This plan shall link the San Francisco Bay Trail system to the planned Sacramento River trails in Yolo and Sacramento Counties. This plan shall include a specific route of a bicycling and hiking trail, the relationship of the route to existing and proposed park and recreational facilities and land and water trail systems, and links to existing and proposed public transportation and transit. The transportation and
 transit links may include, but are not limited to, roadside bus stops, transit facilities, and transportation facilities. The continuous regional recreational corridor planned and executed pursuant to this chapter shall be called the Great California Delta Trail. The continuous regional recreational corridor shall include, but not be limited to, bikeway systems, and hiking and bicycling trails.

(b) The Great California Delta Trail plan shall do all of the following:

(1) Provide that designated environmentally sensitive areas, including wildlife habitats and wetlands, shall not be adversely affected by the trail.

(2) Provide for appropriate buffer zones along those portions of the bikeway system adjacent to designated environmentally sensitive areas and areas with private uses, when appropriate.

(3) Provide that the land and funds used for any purposes under this chapter are not considered mitigation for wetlands losses.

(4) Provide alternative routes to avoid impingement on environmentally sensitive areas, traditional hunting and fishing areas, and areas with private uses, when appropriate.

(5) Provide that no motorized vehicles, except to the extent necessary for emergency services, including, but not limited to, medical and structural emergencies, and for handicap access, be allowed on the trail.

(c) The commission may develop and adopt the plan and the implementation program if it receives sufficient funds, from sources other than the General Fund, to either (1) finance the full costs of developing and adopting the plan or (2) develop and
 implement a defined portion of the plan, such as specific trail segments and related facilities identified in the plan. The commission shall submit the plan and the implementation program to the Legislature and each of the counties within the commission’s service area not later than two years after the commission determines that sufficient funds will be available to complete all or a defined portion of the plan and implementation program.

(d) The commission shall administer the funds used in the planning of the trail.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 51, Sec. 29.   (SB 854)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

5855.

(a) The commission shall establish a technical advisory committee that shall review the trail’s planning, implementation, and funding proposals. The committee shall include members and staff of appropriate regional government associations, local jurisdictions, and districts. Participation in the committee is voluntary and its members are not eligible for reimbursement from the state for costs incurred to participate. The committee may make recommendations, to the commission, on the trail’s planning, implementation, and funding. The executive director of the commission shall convene the meetings of the committee.

(b) A cooperative working relationship shall be established with state and federal agencies, and all other cities, counties, districts, including school districts, and regional government associations that are affected by the proposed trail.

(c) The commission shall establish a stakeholder advisory committee representing groups concerned with environmental and ecological protection of the delta, groups representing agricultural, private, and other business uses of the delta’s land and water, and groups representing bicycling, walking, boating, horseback riding, and other relevant recreational activities. The stakeholder advisory committee shall advise the commission on the trail’s impacts on and uses for committee member constituencies. Participation in the committee is voluntary and its members are not eligible for reimbursement from the state for costs incurred to participate. The committee may make recommendations, to the commission, on the trail’s planning, implementation, and funding. The executive director of the commission shall convene the meetings of the stakeholder advisory committee.

(d) The meetings of the committees established in subdivisions (a) and (c) shall be subject to the provisions of the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 839, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 13. California Natural Landmarks Program [5860. - 5873.]

5860.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The procedures in this chapter set forth the processes and criteria for identifying, evaluating, designating, and monitoring California natural landmarks.

(b) The California Natural Landmarks Program focuses attention on areas of exceptional natural value to the state as a whole rather than to one particular region or locality. The program encourages the owners of California natural landmarks to voluntarily observe preservation precepts.

(c) The California Natural Landmarks Program identifies and preserves natural areas that best illustrate the biological and geological character of the state, enhances the scientific and educational values of preserved areas, strengthens public appreciation of natural history, and fosters a greater concern for the conservation of the state’s heritage.

(d) Many of the state’s most important biological, ecological, and geological features are found either partly or entirely on privately owned land.

(e) There is a need to recognize and promote private as well as public stewardship of natural resources for the public benefit.

(f) It is the intent of the State of California through the California Natural Landmarks Program to recognize and promote partnerships resulting in the stewardship of natural resources on privately and publicly owned land.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 827, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

5861.

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(a) “California natural landmark” means property designated by the director as being of state significance to California because it is an outstanding example of major biological and geological features found within the boundaries of the state.

(b) “California Registry of Natural Landmarks” means the official listing of all designated California natural landmarks.

(c) “Department” means the Department of Parks and Recreation.

(d) “Director” means the Director of Parks and Recreation.

(e) “Natural region” means a distinct physiographic province having similar geologic history, structures, and land forms. The basic physiographic characteristics of a natural region influence its vegetation, climate, soils, and animal life.

(f) (1) “Owner” means the person, corporation, or partnership that holds fee simple title to real property, or its agent, or the head of the public agency or subordinate employee of the public agency to whom that authority is delegated, who is responsible for administering publicly owned land and who has presented satisfactory evidence of his or her legal right to represent the interests of the subject land.

(2) “Owner” does not include a person, partnership, corporation, or public agency that holds, in any form, an easement or less than a fee interest, including any leasehold that is not tantamount to fee ownership, or does not have authority to act on behalf of the property.

(3) (A) A Native American tribe that is the beneficial fee simple owner of real property, with the United States as trustee, is an owner of real property for the purposes of this chapter.

(B) A member of a Native American tribe who is the beneficial owner of real property, held in trust by the United States, is an owner of real property for the purposes of this chapter.

(g) “Potential California natural landmark” means property that, based on a recommendation or initial comparison with other properties within the state or in the same natural region, could merit further study of its qualifications for possible California natural landmark designation.

(h) “Prejudicial procedural error” means a procedural error that reasonably may be considered to have affected the outcome of the designation process.

(i) “Real property” for the purposes of this chapter shall not include land owned by the federal government, unless the agency owning the land requests its inclusion, and the director determines that its inclusion is feasible and in the best interests of the program.

(j) “Representative” means a public or private individual, agency, or organization that is performing actions related to the identification, evaluation, designation, or monitoring of a California natural landmark, on behalf of or in cooperation with the department, either under a contractual agreement or in a volunteer capacity.

(k) “Scientist” means a person whose combination of academic training and professional field experience in the natural region qualifies him or her to identify and comparatively evaluate a natural area at the regional or state level.

(l) “State significance” means property that is one of the best examples of a biological community or geological feature within a natural region of the state, including a terrestrial community, land form, geological feature and process, habitat of native plant and animal species, or fossil evidence of the development of life.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 827, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

5862.

(a) Designation of property by the director as a California natural landmark does not change the property’s ownership and does not dictate activity.

(b) Designation as a California natural landmark does not require, mandate, or authorize, under state law, any further state or local planning, zoning, or other land-use action or decision.
